Utah statutes.
58-60-510.   Evidentiary privilege.

Evidentiary privilege for a licensee under this part concerning admissibility of any confidential communication in administrative, civil, or criminal proceedings is in accordance with Rule 506, Utah Rules of Evidence.



Amended by Chapter 283, 2007 General Session

